Washington statutes.
RCW 30B.04.030

Persons authorized to act as a fiduciary.

Subject to the conditions, restrictions, limitations, and requirements of this title, the following persons are authorized trust institutions in Washington state:

(1) A state trust company with a certificate of authority from the director to exercise the powers of a state trust company pursuant to chapter 30B.08 RCW;

(2) A state bank under Title 30A RCW exercising trust business powers under the authority of the director;

(3) A state bank under Title 32 RCW exercising trust business powers under the authority of the director;

(4) A *state savings association organized under Title 33 RCW exercising trust business powers under authority of Title 33 RCW as permitted by the director;

(5) A national bank authorized by the comptroller of the currency to act as a fiduciary in this state pursuant to 12 U.S.C. Sec. 92a;

(6) A federally chartered savings bank or *savings association authorized by the comptroller of the currency to act as a fiduciary in this state;

(7) An out-of-state state-chartered bank with a branch in this state established or maintained pursuant to and with trust powers under applicable law of a home state;

(8) An out-of-state trust institution with a trust office authorized by the director pursuant to this title;

(9) An alien bank under chapter 30A.42 RCW authorized by the director to act as a fiduciary or engage in trust business in this state pursuant to this title;

(10) A private trust or private trust company exempt from the regulation of the department under chapter 30B.64 RCW; or

(11) An exempt person under this title pursuant to RCW 30B.04.040.

[ 2014 c 37 s 305.]

NOTES:

*Reviser's note: RCW 30B.04.005 was amended by 2019 c 389 s 2, deleting the definitions of "savings association" and "state savings association."